Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.150

Modification of orders.

Any order made by the court in the case of a dependent child may be changed, modified, or set aside, only upon a showing of a change in circumstance or as provided in RCW 13.34.120.

[ 1993 c 412 s 9; 1990 c 246 s 6; 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 43; 1913 c 160 s 15; RRS s 1987-15. Formerly RCW 13.04.150.]

NOTES:

Severability—1990 c 246: See note following RCW 13.34.060.

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.